en: Marker caliber: 0.40 caliber; 0.43 caliber; 0.50 caliber; 0.62 caliber; 0.68 caliber; Other
cs: Ráže markeru: Kalibr 0,40; Kalibr 0,43; Kalibr 0,50; Kalibr 0,62; Kalibr 0,68; Jiné
pl: Kaliber markera: Kaliber 0,40; Kaliber 0.43; Kaliber 0.50; Kaliber 0.62; Kaliber 0.68; Inne
zh-CN: 标记器口径: 0.40 口径; 0.43 口径; 0.50 口径; 0.62 口径; 0.68 口径; 其他
it: Calibro del marker: Calibro 0,40; Calibro 0,43; Calibro 0,50; Calibro 0,62; Calibro 0,68; Altro
da: Markørkaliber: 0.40 kaliber; 0,43 kaliber; 0,50 kaliber; 0,62 kaliber; 0,68 kaliber; Andet
ko: 마커 구경: 0.40 구경; 0.43 구경; 0.50 구경; 0.62 구경; 0.68 구경; 기타
nb: Markørkaliber: 0,40 kaliber; 0,43 kaliber; 0,50 kaliber; 0,62 kaliber; 0,68 kaliber; Annet
fi: Merkkaimen kaliiperi: 0.40 kaliiperi; 0,43 kaliiperia; 0,50 kaliiperia; 0,62 kaliiperia; 0,68 kaliiperia; Muu
sk-SK: Kaliber markera: Kaliber 0,40; Kaliber 0,43; Kaliber 0,50; Kaliber 0,62; Kaliber 0,68; Iný
es: Calibre del marcador: Calibre 0,40; Calibre 0.43; Calibre 0.50; Calibre 0.62; Calibre 0.68; Otro
pt-BR: Marcador calibre: Calibre 0,40; Calibre 0.43; Calibre 0.50; Calibre 0.62; Calibre 0.68; Outro
tr: İşaretleyici kalibresi: 0,40 kalibre; 0,43 kalibre; 0,50 kalibre; 0,62 kalibre; 0,68 kalibre; Diğer
lt-LT: Markerio kalibras: 0,40 kalibras; 0,43 kalibras; 0,50 kalibras; 0,62 kalibras; 0,68 kalibras; Kita
ja: マーカー口径: 0.40口径; 0.43口径; 0.50口径; 0.62口径; 0.68口径; その他
ru: Калибр маркера: Калибр 0.40; Калибр 0.43; Калибр 0.50; Калибр 0.62; Калибр 0.68; Другое
pt-PT: Calibre do marcador: Calibre 0,40; Calibre 0,43; Calibre 0,50; Calibre 0,62; Calibre 0,68; Outro
ro-RO: Calibru marker: Calibru 0.40; Calibru 0.43; Calibru 0.50; Calibru 0.62; Calibru 0.68; Altele
sv: Markörkaliber: Kaliber 0.40; Kaliber 0,43; Kaliber 0,50; Kaliber 0,62; Kaliber 0,68; Annat
bg-BG: Калибър на маркера: 0,40 калибър; 0,43 калибър; 0,50 калибър; 0,62 калибър; 0,68 калибър; Друго
zh-TW: 彩彈槍口徑: 0.40 口徑; 0.43 口徑; 0.50 口徑; 0.62 口徑; 0.68 口徑; 其他
el: Διαμέτρημα μαρκαδόρου: Διαμέτρημα 0,40; Διαμέτρημα 0,43; Διαμέτρημα 0,50; Διαμέτρημα 0,62; Διαμέτρημα 0,68; Άλλο
vi: Cỡ nòng súng đánh dấu: Cỡ nòng 0.40; Cỡ nòng 0.43; Cỡ nòng 0.50; Cỡ nòng 0.62; Cỡ nòng 0.68; Khác
th: ขนาดลำกล้องปืนเพนท์บอล: ลำกล้อง 0.40; ลำกล้อง 0.43; ลำกล้อง 0.50; ลำกล้อง 0.62; ลำกล้อง 0.68; อื่นๆ
fr: Calibre du marqueur: Calibre 0,40; Calibre 0,43; Calibre 0,50; Calibre 0,62; Calibre 0,68; Autre
hu: Marker kalibere: 0,40-es kaliber; 0,43-as kaliber; 0,50-es kaliber; 0,62-es kaliber; 0,68-as kaliber; Egyéb
sl-SI: Kaliber markerja: Kaliber 0.40; Kaliber 0.43; Kaliber 0.50; Kaliber 0.62; Kaliber 0.68; Drugo
hr-HR: Kalibar markera: Kalibar 0.40; Kalibar 0.43; Kalibar 0.50; Kalibar 0.62; Kalibar 0.68; Ostalo
de: Kaliber des Markierers: Kaliber .40; Kaliber 0,43; Kaliber 0,50; Kaliber 0,62; Kaliber 0,68; Sonstiges
nl: Marker kaliber: Kaliber 0,40; 0.43 kaliber; 0.50 kaliber; 0.62 kaliber; 0.68 kaliber; Overige